Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) General program and
services provided to
care facility residents ............... $ 5,234,413
(2) Public guardian and
conservator program ................ $ 1,978,490
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $853,177
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and in-
cluding federal Older Americans Act funds received from the Department  of Human Ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds  and federal funds not described in this section, collected
or received by the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
SECTION 3.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 10, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 18, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5520 (SB 5520-A) Page 2